scripts/dict/hunspell_main.aff
#
# hunspell_main.aff — Main hunspell affix file
#
# SPDX-FileCopyrightText: 2025 Linutronix GmbH
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-2.0-only
#
# All of the project's hunspell dictionary files depend on having this
# affix file defined.
#
# Check:
#   - hunspell(5)
#   - scripts/dict/*.dic
#   - scripts/spellcheck_xml.sh

SET UTF-8

#
# Suffixes to be used in hunspell dictionary files
# They can be used in all *.dic files, in the form:
#
#	bitmask/S
#	breakpoint/S
#	virtualize/DS
#

# S suffixes (plural, verbs)
SFX S Y 2
SFX S   0     es         [sxzh]
SFX S   0     s          [^sxzhy]

# D suffixes (past verbs)
SFX D Y 2
SFX D   0     d          e
SFX D   0     ed         [^e]

# G suffixes (present participle / gerund)
SFX G Y 2
SFX G   e     ing        e
SFX G   0     ing        [^e]

#
# Expressions for:
#
#	Hex digits	0x[0-9]+
#	Version tags	v[0-9]+
#	Byte units	[0-9]+
#
# Definitions for vxHDU flags is at:
#
#	expression-flags.dic
#

COMPOUNDMIN 1

COMPOUNDRULE 3
COMPOUNDRULE xHH*
COMPOUNDRULE vDD*
COMPOUNDRULE DD*U
